Wisconsin, session 2025, SB672.
do enact as follows:SB672,11Section 1. 157.06 (15m) of the statutes is created to read:SB672,2,72157.06 (15m) Coverage prohibited if organ is transplanted in or 3originates from certain countries. (a) In this subsection, “forced organ 4harvesting” means the removal of one or more organs from a living person, by 5means of coercion, abduction, deception, fraud, or abuse of power over a position of 6vulnerability, or from a person killed for the purpose of removal of one or more 7organs.SB672,2,108(b) Subject to par. (c), no payer to which this subsection applies under par. (e) 9may knowingly cover a human organ transplant or posttransplant care if any of the 10following apply:SB672,2,13111. The transplant operation is performed in the People’s Republic of China or 12in another country known to have participated in forced organ harvesting, as 13designated by the department under par. (d).SB672,2,17142. The human organ to be transplanted was procured by sale or donation 15originating in the People’s Republic of China or in another country known to have 16participated in forced organ harvesting, as designated by the department under 17par. (d).SB672,3,218(c) Paragraph (b) does not apply to any posttransplant service or care provided 1to save the life of an individual after the individual receives a human organ 2transplant that is prohibited under this subsection.SB672,3,63(d) The department may designate a country whose government funds, 4sponsors, or otherwise facilitates forced organ harvesting as a country known to 5have participated in forced organ harvesting for purposes of the prohibition under 6par. (b).SB672,3,97(e) This subsection applies to any disability insurance policy, as defined in s. 8632.895 (1) (a), any self-insured health plan, as defined in s. 632.745 (24), and the 9Medical Assistance program under subch. IV of ch. 49.SB672,210Section 2. Initial applicability.SB672,3,1311(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this 12act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this 13subsection, except as provided in sub. (2).SB672,3,1814(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 15agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this act first applies to 16policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day 17on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, 18modified, or renewed, whichever is later.SB672,319Section 3. Effective date.SB672,3,2120(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 21publication.SB672,3,2222